Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.140

Rules for budgetary procedures—Review by superintendent—Separate accounting of state and local revenues—Notice of irregularity—Budget revisions.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt such rules as will ensure proper budgetary procedures and practices, including monthly financial statements consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.09.200, and this chapter. By the 2019-20 school year, the rules must require school districts to provide separate accounting of state and local revenues to expenditures.

(2) If the superintendent of public instruction determines upon a review of the budget of any district that said budget does not comply with the budget procedures established by this chapter or by rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, or the provisions of RCW 43.09.200, the superintendent shall give written notice of this determination to the board of directors of the local school district.

(3) The local school district, notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall, within thirty days from the date the superintendent of public instruction issues a notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, submit a revised budget which meets the requirements of RCW 43.09.200, this chapter, and the rules of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 602; 2006 c 263 s 202; 1990 c 33 s 422; 1983 c 59 s 10; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.65.465.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.